Maryland, session 2026, SB1007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(O–1) DISCOVERY POINT DEVELOPMENT PROJECT. PROVIDE A
GRANT TO THE COLLEGE PARK CITY – UNIVERSITY
PARTNERSHIP, INC. FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING,
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, AND CAPITAL
EQUIPPING OF THE DISCOVERY POINT REDEVELOPMENT
PROJECT. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2032 (PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY) .................................... 22,246
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 643 of the Acts of 2025
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(O) [Discovery Point Redevelopment Project] MARYLAND
INDEPENDENT COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITY ASSOCIATION
– MCDANIEL COLLEGE. Provide a grant to [the Board of
Directors of the College Park City – University Partnership,
Inc.] MCDANIEL COLLEGE for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, and capital equipping of the [Discovery Point
Redevelopment Project] GILL PHYSICAL EDUCATION
LEARNING CENTER. Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act,
this grant may not terminate before June 1, [2032 (Prince
George’s County)] 2028 (CARROLL COUNTY) .......................... [22,246]
2,977,754
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018
Section 1(3)
RQ00 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM
(C) R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center – Phase II. Provide a
grant to the University of Maryland Medical System to assist in
completing construction of Phase II of renovations and upgrades
to the R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
– 3 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 2,000,000
(D) Comprehensive Cancer and Organ Transplant Treatment
Center. Provide a grant to the University of Maryland Medical
System to design, construct, and capital equip facilities to
expand clinical programs of the Marlene and Stewart
Greenbaum Comprehensive Cancer and Organ Transplant
Treatment Center. Provided that it is the intent of the General
Assembly that State support for this project total $175,000,000
beginning in fiscal 2019. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2028 (Baltimore City) ................................................... 2,500,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(CH) The Compound. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of The
Compound for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of an arts complex (Baltimore City) ................ [250,000]
150,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(BJ) Noyes Children’s Library Renovation. Provide a grant equal to
the lesser of (i) $100,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
provided, to the Board of Directors of the Noyes Children’s
Library Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Noyes Children’s
Library. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 100,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(BQ) National Road Museum. Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of
(i) $50,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,]
to the Board of Directors of the National Road Heritage
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the National Road
Museum. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027
(Washington County) ................................................................... 50,000
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapter 141 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(CB) Let’s Thrive Baltimore Youth in Action. Provide a grant to Let’s
Thrive Baltimore Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Let’s Thrive
Baltimore property. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2028 (Baltimore City) ................................................... 250,000
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AB) Harford Crisis Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Harford Crisis Center, Inc. for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Harford Crisis
Center. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028
(Harford County) ......................................................................... 750,000
(AC) HEAT Center – National Center for Manufacturing Sciences.
Provide a grant to the County Executive and County Council of
Harford County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the HEAT Center in
Aberdeen. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028
(Harford County) ......................................................................... 875,000
(AG) Imagination Stage – New Storage Facility. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Imagination Stage, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new facility for storage and operations
for Imagination Stage in Bethesda. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
– 5 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2029 (Montgomery County) ... 550,000
(BZ) Everyman Theatre. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
the Everyman Theatre, Incorporated for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Everyman Theatre facility, located in Baltimore City (Baltimore
City) ............................................................................................... [500,000]
0
(BZ–1) ARENA PLAYERS, INC. PROVIDE A GRANT TO ARENA
PLAYERS, INC. FOR THE ACQUISITION, PLANNING,
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPAIR,
RENOVATION, RECONSTRUCTION, SITE IMPROVEMENT,
AND CAPITAL EQUIPPING OF THE ARENA PLAYERS
THEATER FACILITIES. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2033 (BALTIMORE CITY) ....................................... 500,000
(DN) Westport Community Economic Development Corporation.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Westport
Community Development Corporation and the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Annapolis Road
Revitalization Project and the Harbor West Collaborative
Center, located in Baltimore City. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 (Baltimore City) ............ 50,000
(DX) Harford Road Senior Center. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
City Council of Baltimore for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Harford Road
Senior Center, including repairs to the building’s roof[, located
in Baltimore City]. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2028 (Baltimore City) ................................................... 150,000
(ES) Town of Brookeville [Market Street] INFRASTRUCTURE
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Commissioners of the
Town of Brookeville for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of INFRASTRUCTURE
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
improvements [to] IN the Town of Brookeville [Market Street
Improvements]. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2031 (Montgomery County) ....................................................... 100,000
(EW) Chesapeake Arts Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Chesapeake Arts Center, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Chesapeake Arts Center[, located in Anne Arundel County].
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 2031
(Anne Arundel County) ............................................................... 150,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(AC) Calvert Marine Museum Paleontology Collections and
Research Center. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$250,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Directors of the Calvert Marine Museum Society,
Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Calvert Marine Museum Paleontology
Collections and Research Center[, located in Calvert County].
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 30, 2028
(Calvert County) ...........................................................................
250,000
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(M) Harford Road Senior Center. Provide a grant equal to the lesser
of (i) $100,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided,
to the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Harford Road Senior Center, including repairs
to the building’s roof[, located in Baltimore City].
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 100,000
(AA) Dorchester Center for the Arts. Provide a grant [equal to the
lesser of (i) $80,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund
– 7 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
provided,] to the Board of Directors of the Dorchester Center for
the Arts, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Arts Performance
Hall, located in Dorchester County. [Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of in kind
contributions] NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 (Dorchester County) ............................................................ 80,000
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 595 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(AL) Jericho Road Stone Bank Barn. Provide a grant of $200,000, to
the Board of Directors of the Friends of Jerusalem Mill for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Jericho Road Stone Bank Barn building, located in Harford
County, subject to a requirement that the grantee provide and
expend a matching fund of $100,000. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of in kind
contributions. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 (Harford County) ................................................................ 200,000
ZA03 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(AK) Jericho Road Stone Bank Barn. Provide a grant of $50,000, to
the Board of Directors of the Friends of Jerusalem Mill for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Jericho Road Stone Bank Barn building, located in Harford
County, subject to a requirement that the grantee provide and
expend a matching fund of $25,000. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of in kind
contributions. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 (Harford County) ............................................................... 50,000
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AF) Imagination Stage – New Storage Facility. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Imagination Stage, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new facility for storage and operations
for Imagination Stage in Bethesda. NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT
TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2029 (Montgomery County) ... 300,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(B) Civil Air Patrol Squadron Building. Provide a grant to the
[Board of Governors of the Civil Air Patrol] ALLEGANY
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Civil Air Patrol Squadron Building[, located in Allegany
County]. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2029
(Allegany County) ........................................................................ 42,000
(AQ) [Young Adult Residential Fellowship Program] HISTORICAL
STABILIZATION AND RENOVATION – 426 HUTCHINS
AVENUE. Provide a grant [of $125,000,] to the Board of
Directors of the Pleasant Hope Community Development
Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of [the Young Adult Residential Fellowship
Program facilities, located in Baltimore City,] 426 HUTCHINS
AVENUE, subject to a requirement that the grantee provide and
expend a matching fund of $100,000. Notwithstanding Section
1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of real property,
in kind contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective
date of this Act. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS
ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 (Baltimore City) .................................................................. [125,000]
225,000
(BR) Mount Airy Center Street. Provide a grant of $500,000, to the
Mayor and Town Council of the Town of Mount Airy for the
– 9 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Mount Airy Center Street extension,
located in Carroll County, subject to a requirement that the
grantee provide and expend a matching fund of $450,000.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2029
(Carroll County)........................................................................... 500,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(BJ) Kensington [Multipurpose Recreation Center] TOWN HALL.
Provide a grant [equal to the lesser of (i) $100,000 or (ii) the
amount of the matching fund provided to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County] TO THE MAYOR
AND TOWN COUNCIL OF THE TOWN OF KENSINGTON for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of [a
multipurpose recreation center including the installation of
playground equipment, located in Montgomery County] THE
KENSINGTON TOWN HALL. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION
1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 (Montgomery County) ........................... 100,000
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapter 722 of the Acts of 2024
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(DF) Town of Brookeville Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Commissioners of the Town of Brookeville for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements [on Market
Street, located] in the Town of Brookeville. Notwithstanding
Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant may not terminate before
June 1, 2031 (Montgomery County) ........................................... 350,000
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
(DE) Doctor First Mobile Communication System. Provide [funds] A
GRANT TO DRFIRST.COM, INC. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Doctor First Mobile Communication System (Statewide) ......... 500,000
(FL) Gibson Grove. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of First
Agape African Methodist Episcopal Zion (A.M.E.Z.) Church for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Historic Gibson Grove[, located in Montgomery
County]. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2030
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 150,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(B) Civil Air Patrol Squadron Building. Provide a grant to the
[Board of Governors of the Civil Air Patrol] ALLEGANY
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Civil Air Patrol Squadron Building[, located in Allegany
County] (Allegany County) ......................................................... 50,000
(BK) Gibson Grove. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of First
Agape African Methodist Episcopal Zion (A.M.E.Z.) Church for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Historic Gibson Grove[, located in Montgomery
County]. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT,
THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2030
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 400,000
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapter 626 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(BJ) Riverdale Park Hiker Biker Trail. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and Town Council of the Town of Riverdale Park for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Riverdale Park Hiker Biker Trail, including the realignment of
– 11 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the Hiker Biker Trail and Rhode Island and Maryland Avenues.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2030 (Prince
George’s County) ........................................................................... 850,000
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(E) Annapolis City Dock. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City
Council of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of resilience and
revitalization projects at the Annapolis City Dock, provided
that $1,200,000 of this authorization made for the purpose of
providing a grant for the Annapolis City Dock project may not
be encumbered or expended until the Mayor and City Council
of the City of Annapolis submit a report to the budget
committees on the cost estimates and proposed financing
sources of the project. The report shall be submitted by August
1, 2022, and the budget committees shall have 45 days to
review and comment. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE
JUNE 1, 2028 (Anne Arundel County) ...................................... 1,200,000
(EW) [East Baltimore Transfer Station] BOWLEY’S LANE
SANITATION YARD. Provide a grant to the Baltimore City
Department of Public Works for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
[transfer station and] small hauler site AND OTHER SOLID
WASTE FACILITIES IMPROVEMENTS in East Baltimore at
Bowley’s Lane Sanitation Yard (Baltimore City) ....................... 4,000,000
(FU) Ambassador Theater. Provide a grant to the [Board of Directors
of Artspace Baltimore, LLC] AMBASSADOR CENTER FOR
ARTS AND CULTURE, INC. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Ambassador Theater (Baltimore City) ....................................... 2,500,000
(JM) Catonsville Middle School. Provide a grant to the [County
Executive and County Council of Baltimore County] BOARD OF
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
EDUCATION OF BALTIMORE COUNTY for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Catonsville Middle School, including a scoreboard and
electronic sign (Baltimore County) ............................................... 100,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(AL) Roberta’s House. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Roberta’s House, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Roberta’s House,
including the rooftop space, AND THE ACQUISITION AND
RENOVATION OF ADJACENT PROPERTIES (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 150,000
(BJ) Pikesville High School Comfort Station. Provide a grant to the
[County Executive and County Council of Baltimore County]
BOARD OF EDUCATION OF BALTIMORE COUNTY for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
comfort station facility at Pikesville High School (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... 200,000
(BN) Warren Elementary School Playground Replacement. Provide a
grant to the [County Executive and County Council of Baltimore
County] BOARD OF EDUCATION OF BALTIMORE COUNTY
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of playground equipment (Baltimore County) ............ 150,000
(DM) [Long Branch–Arliss Neighborhood Park] LONG BRANCH
LOCAL PARK. Provide a grant to the Maryland–National
Capital Park and Planning Commission for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, EXPANSION, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the [Long Branch–Arliss Neighborhood Park]
LONG BRANCH LOCAL PARK (Montgomery County) ............. 362,701
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(B) Civil Air Patrol Squadron Building. Provide a grant to the
[Board of Governors of the Civil Air Patrol] ALLEGANY
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
– 13 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Civil Air Patrol Squadron Building (Allegany County) ............. 50,000
(AH) Roberta’s House. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Roberta’s House, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of Roberta’s House,
including the rooftop space, AND THE ACQUISITION AND
RENOVATION OF ADJACENT PROPERTIES (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 150,000
(AX) Pikesville High School Comfort Station. Provide a grant to the
[County Executive and County Council of Baltimore County]
BOARD OF EDUCATION OF BALTIMORE COUNTY for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
comfort station facility at Pikesville High School (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... 600,000
(CQ) [Newport Mill Local Park] STONEYBROOK LOCAL PARK.
Provide a grant to the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the [Newport Mill
Local Park] STONEYBROOK LOCAL PARK.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2031
(Montgomery County) ................................................................. 300,000
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 410 of the
Acts of 2024
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(MO) Park Heights [Workforce Housing] COMMUNITY
INVESTMENT. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Park Heights Renaissance to be used, in consultation with [the
Department of Housing and Community Development, the
Maryland Thoroughbred Racetrack Operating Authority, and]
the governing body of the Pimlico Redevelopment Community
Compact, for investments [in workforce housing] that are
consistent with THE JOINT PLAN REQUIRED UNDER §
10–646.1(B)(6) OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
ARTICLE AND the Park Heights Master Plan Area ................ 10,000,000
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(BS) Twinbrook Community Recreation Center [Gender–Neutral
Restrooms] AND TWINBROOK ANNEX BUILDING. Provide a
grant to the Mayor and City Council of the City of Rockville for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Twinbrook Community Recreation
Center AND TWINBROOK ANNEX BUILDING, INCLUDING
RESTROOM FACILITIES AND OTHER GENERAL
IMPROVEMENTS (Montgomery County) ................................... 350,000
(CD) Holy Cross Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Holy Cross Health, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the [Holy Cross Health
cancer center in Wheaton] HOLY CROSS HOSPITAL BIPLANE
ROOM (Montgomery County) ....................................................... 2,000,000
(DG) Doctor First Mobile Communication System. Provide [funds] A
GRANT TO DRFIRST.COM, INC. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Doctor First Mobile Communication System (Statewide) ......... 500,000
(DR) Woodlawn High School. Provide a grant to the [County
Executive and County Council of Baltimore County] BOARD OF
EDUCATION OF BALTIMORE COUNTY for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Woodlawn High School, including exterior lighting (Baltimore
County) .......................................................................................... 75,000
(GC) [Shakespeare Beyond the Walls – Assets for Touring Company]
CHESAPEAKE SHAKESPEARE COMPANY THEATRE.
Provide a grant to [the Board of Trustees of] the Chesapeake
Shakespeare Company for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of [Shakespeare
– 15 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Beyond the Walls] THE CHESAPEAKE SHAKESPEARE
COMPANY THEATRE (Baltimore City) ..................................... 450,000
(HY) Howard County New Library Complex. Provide a grant to the
County Executive and County Council of Howard County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a new library complex AT THE DOWNTOWN
COLUMBIA LAKEFRONT LOCATION (Howard County) .......... 5,000,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Y) [Shakespeare Beyond the Walls – Assets for Touring Company]
CHESAPEAKE SHAKESPEARE COMPANY THEATRE.
Provide a grant to [the Board of Trustees of] the Chesapeake
Shakespeare Company for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of [Shakespeare
Beyond the Walls] THE CHESAPEAKE SHAKESPEARE
COMPANY THEATRE (Baltimore City) ..................................... 50,000
(DA) [Solar Panels for Ridge VFD] RIDGE VOLUNTEER FIRE
DEPARTMENT. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Ridge Volunteer Fire Department, Incorporated for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Ridge Volunteer Fire Department,
INCLUDING NEW FIRE RESCUE APPARATUS (St. Mary’s
County) ........................................................................................ 200,000
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AC) North Bethesda Metro Station Access Improvements. Provide
a grant to the [Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority] COUNTY EXECUTIVE AND COUNTY COUNCIL OF
MONTGOMERY COUNTY MONTGOMERY COUNTY,
MARYLAND for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
EXPANSION, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the North Bethesda
Metro Station (Montgomery County) ......................................... 3,000,000
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
(BU) Choice Neighborhood Initiative. Provide a grant to the Mayor
and City Council of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
expansion of affordable housing in the City of Annapolis.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
GRANT MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 (Anne
Arundel County) .......................................................................... 1,000,000
(BZ) Town of Brookeville Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Commissioners of the Town of Brookeville for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, EXPANSION,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of infrastructure improvements [on Market
Street] IN THE TOWN OF BROOKEVILLE (Montgomery
County) ........................................................................................ 150,000
(EC) York Road Commercial Corridor. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the York Road Partnership, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Greater Govans/York Road Corridor revitalization
“NON–COMMERCIAL” projects, RESTRICTING THE USE OF
$300,000 OF THE GRANT TO BE USED ONLY IN
PARTNERSHIP WITH BALTIMORE GREEN SPACE FOR
ECOLOGICAL ASSESSMENT, SITE DESIGN AND MAPPING,
LAND CLEARING, TEMPORARY FENCING, AND EQUIPMENT
ACQUISITION FOR THE GOVANS URBAN FOREST
RESTORATION AND MASTER PLANNING (Baltimore City) ....
600,000
(FM) Holy Cross Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of Holy Cross Health, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the [Holy Cross Health
cancer center in Wheaton] HOLY CROSS HOSPITAL BIPLANE
ROOM (Montgomery County) ....................................................... 2,000,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(AF) York Road Commercial Corridor. Provide a grant to the [Board
of Directors of the York Corridor Business Improvement
District Management Authority] YORK ROAD
PARTNERSHIP, INC. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
– 17 –

Ch. 176 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
improvement, and capital equipping of the York Road
Commercial Corridor Neighborhood Signage and Pedestrian
Safety Infrastructure project (Baltimore City) ........................... 105,000
(CG) Leisure World of Maryland – Healthy Community Initiative.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Leisure World
of Maryland Corporation for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of [a zero emission
14–passenger] wheelchair accessible [bus] BUSES
(Montgomery County) ................................................................... 250,000
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(B) Friends Aware. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of
Friends Aware, Incorporated for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, EXPANSION, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Friends Aware property, INCLUDING THE PURCHASE OF
PROPERTY FOR RESIDENTIAL HOUSING (Allegany
County) ......................................................................................... 225,000
Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2025
Section 1(3)
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(BP) Black Sox Park. Provide a grant to [Parks and People, Inc. and]
the South Baltimore Gateway Partnership for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Black Sox Park (Baltimore City) ................................................. 3,000,000
(CM) North Bethesda Metro Station Access Improvements. Provide a
grant to [the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority]
MONTGOMERY COUNTY, MARYLAND for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
North Bethesda Metro Station (Montgomery County) ................. 600,000
(HA) Sandy Spring Museum [Library]. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Sandy Spring Museum for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 176
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
Sandy Spring Museum [Library] (Montgomery County) .......... 200,000
(IX) St. Pius X Property. Provide a grant to the [Board of Financial
Administration of the Archdiocese of Baltimore] COUNTY
EXECUTIVE AND COUNTY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE
COUNTY for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the St. Pius X property
and field space (Baltimore County) ............................................ 500,000
ZA02 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(R) Forest Park Renaissance. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the WBC Community Development Corporation for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of blighted residential and commercial
properties [on and around the business center at the intersection
of Liberty Heights and Garrison Blvd. including two shovel
ready projects: Forest Park Gateway Center located at 3901
Liberty Heights and a recently acquired lot located at 3403
Garrison Blvd.] (Baltimore City) ................................................. 400,000
(BP) [New Hampshire Estates Neighborhood Parks] LONG
BRANCH LOCAL PARK. Provide a grant to the Board of
Commissioners of the Maryland–National Capital Park and
Planning Commission for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the [New
Hampshire Estates Neighborhood Parks] LONG BRANCH
LOCAL PARK project properties including a lighted soccer field
AND SKATEPARK (Montgomery County) .................................. 228,000
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 19 –